Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.185.035

Funding for student identification.

(1) Other basic education funding can be used alongside categorical funding to identify students and provide programs and services for highly capable students.

(2) Each school district must conduct universal screenings in accordance with RCW 28A.185.030 to find students who may qualify for potential highly capable program placement.

[ 2023 c 265 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2023 c 265: See note following RCW 28A.185.020.